Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202525-21,291
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Exploited Children's Civil Remedy Act:

(1) Access software provider means a provider of software, including client or server software, or enabling tools that do any one or more of the following: (a) Filter, screen, allow, or disallow content; (b) pick, choose, analyze, or digest content; or (c) transmit, receive, display, forward, cache, search, subset, organize, reorganize, or translate content;

(2) Aid or assist another with the creation, distribution, or active acquisition of child sexual abuse material means help a principal in some appreciable manner with the creation, distribution, or active acquisition of a visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its participants or portrayed observers. The term also includes knowingly employing, forcing, authorizing, inducing, or otherwise causing a child to engage in any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its participants or portrayed observers. No parent, stepparent, legal guardian, or person with custody and control of a child, knowing the content thereof, may consent to such child engaging in any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its participants or portrayed observers;

(3) Cable operator means any person or group of persons (a) who provides cable service over a cable system and directly or through one or more affiliates owns a significant interest in such cable system or (b) who otherwise controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement, the management and operation of such a cable system;

(4) Child has the same meaning as in section 28-1802;

(5) Create means to knowingly create, make, manufacture, direct, publish, finance, or in any manner generate;

(6) Distribute means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person, source, or location to another person, source, or location. The term includes, but is not limited to, renting, selling, delivering, displaying, advertising, trading, mailing, procuring, circulating, lending, exhibiting, transmitting, transmuting, transferring, disseminating, presenting, or providing any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct which has a child as one of its participants or portrayed observers;

(7) Interactive computer service means any information service system or access software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a service or system that provides access to the Internet and such systems operated or services offered by libraries or educational institutions;

(8) Participant means a child who appears in any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct and is portrayed or actively engaged in acts of sexually explicit conduct appearing therein;

(9) Portrayed observer means a child who appears in any visual depiction where sexually explicit conduct is likewise portrayed or occurring within the child's presence or in the child's proximity;

(10) Sexually explicit conduct has the same meaning as in section 28-1802;

(11) Telecommunications service means the offering of telecommunications for a fee directly to the public, or to such classes of users as to be effectively available directly to the public, regardless of the facilities used; and

(12) Visual depiction has the same meaning as in section 28-1802.

Laws 2010, LB728, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 7.